Massachusetts, session 194th, H3743.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Mobile telephone” the
following definition:-
“Moped”, a pedal bicycle with a helper motor or a non-pedal bicycle with a motor,
which: (i) has a cylinder capacity of no more than 50 cubic centimeters; (ii) has an automatic
transmission; (iii) is capable of a maximum speed of not more than 30 miles per hour; and (iv)
complies with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards; provided, that a moped that
does not have a restrictor plate shall be classified as a motorcycle.
SECTION 2. Section 8 of said chapter 90, as most recently amended by section 41 of
chapter 28 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The operator of a moped shall obtain a motorcycle license.
of 1